Georgia, session 2025_26, HB269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1A of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to early care and
learning, is amended in Code Section 20-1A-10, relating to regulation of early care and
education programs, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(g.1) Child care learning centers and family child care learning homes shall maintain a
commercial general liability insurance policy or policies affording coverage for bodily
injury and property damage in an amount not less than $500,000.00 for a single occurrence
and $1 million in the aggregate."
H. B. 269
- 1 -

LC 55 0413
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 269
- 2 -